test/src/morphology/N-kutaa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kuțā: # Noun 57 'eng /est kutsuke/fin' - full paradigm
     kuțā+N+Sg+Nom: kuțā
     kuțā+N+Sg+Gen: kuțā
     kuțā+N+Sg+Par: kuțāzt
     kuțā+N+Sg+Dat: kuțān
     kuțā+N+Sg+Ins: kuțāks
     kuțā+N+Sg+Ill: kuțāz
     kuțā+N+Sg+Ela: kuțāst
     kuțā+N+Pl+Nom: kuțād
     kuțā+N+Pl+Gen: kuțād
     kuțā+N+Pl+Par: kuțīdi
     kuțā+N+Pl+Dat: kuțādõn
     kuțā+N+Pl+Ins: kuțādõks
     kuțā+N+Pl+Ill: kuțīž
     kuțā+N+Pl+Ela: kuțīst
